src/fst/morphology/stems/verb_stems.lexc
! These are the Blackfoot verb stems.
! They are organized by their inflectional classes.

LEXICON VERB_STEMS
! LEXICON PREFIXES
@R.class.VAI@	VAI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VII@	VII_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTI@	VTI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTA@	VTA_STEMS ;
@R.class.NOUN@	VAI_STEMS ;
@R.class.NOUN@	VII_STEMS ;
@R.class.NOUN@	VTI_STEMS ;
@R.class.NOUN@	VTA_STEMS ;    
!@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@ VAI_STEMS ;
!@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@ VII_STEMS ;
!@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@ VTI_STEMS ;
!@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@ VTA_STEMS ;
